Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXVIII Mines and Minerals
CHAPTER 353 Mineral Conservation And Development
353.330.
Parties — Representation of minors, mentally disabled, and persons not in being.

All of the persons in being who have any present or contingent interest in the lands or estate or interest sought to be leased shall be made parties to the proceedings authorized in KRS

353.300

to

353.380

, with any infant or infants being represented either by next friend or statutory guardian or guardian ad litem, or in the case of constructive service of summons by a warning order attorney appointed as in other cases. Any person adjudged mentally disabled shall be represented by his guardian or conservator or by guardian ad litem, or, in the case of constructive service of summons as in civil actions generally, by a warning order attorney appointed as in other cases. If the court specifically finds that the welfare or interest of any person or persons not in being requires special representation, the court may appoint a trustee ad litem to represent such unknown parties not in being or each separate class thereof, and such trustee ad litem shall file such pleadings or answer and take such steps as he deems proper, and such unknown persons will be fully bound by the proceedings hereunder. Otherwise, and in the absence of such finding by the court, it shall not be necessary to make parties any persons not in being, either as “unknown defendants” or otherwise, but the persons in being who are parties shall stand for and represent the full title and whole interest in said lands or estate or interest therein, and all parties not in being who might have some contingent or future interest therein, and all persons, whether in being or not in being, having any interest, present, future or contingent, in the property sought to be leased, will be fully bound by the proceedings hereunder. It shall be permissible, however, to make defendants any unknown persons who might have any interest in the land sought to be leased, under the style of “unknown defendants.”

History.

Enact. Acts 1944, ch. 76, § 4; 1982, ch. 141, § 92, effective July 1, 1982.

353.340.
Alignment of parties — Process.

Parties to the proceedings hereunder may be aligned either as plaintiffs or defendants, but there shall be one (1) or more parties plaintiff and one (1) or more parties defendant. In the proceedings authorized hereunder any defendant who does not enter his appearance may be served with process as provided by law with reference to civil actions generally.

History.

Enact. Acts 1944, ch. 76, § 5.

353.350.
Bond of trustee — Terms of sale of lease.

Should the court appoint a trustee pursuant to KRS

353.300

, the court shall, in its decree, require such trustee to give a bond in favor of the owners of the property which is to be leased and shall fix the amount of such bond. The decree of the court shall further provide for all the terms and provisions of the lease which the trustee is authorized to make. It shall be discretionary with the court as to whether or not the trustee’s sale of lease shall be public or private, and the decree shall provide therefor, and if a public sale be authorized the court shall, in its decree, fix and determine the notice to be given. Such sale shall be for cash, payable on confirmation of sale. No appraisement shall be required.

History.

Enact. Acts 1944, ch. 76, § 6.

353.360.
Execution of sale of lease — Report — Confirmation.

The trustee shall proceed, conformably to the provisions of such decree, to sell the lease authorized thereby, and after making such sale shall make a report thereof to the court. Upon filing of such report, the court may hear evidence as to whether or not the sale price is reasonable, and, if the court be satisfied with the sale and the amount received therefor, such sale shall be confirmed by the court and the lease executed by the trustee approved by the court on the face thereof.

History.

Enact. Acts 1944, ch. 76, § 7.

353.370.
Separate lease by guardian or conservator unnecessary.

If a trustee’s lease is granted hereunder, even though one (1) of the parties who has an interest or possible interest in the property covered by such lease is a minor or a person adjudged mentally disabled, no separate guardian’s lease or conservator’s lease shall be necessary.

History.

Enact. Acts 1944, ch. 76, § 8; 1982, ch. 141, § 93, effective July 1, 1982.

353.380.
Disposition of proceeds.

All funds received by any trustee appointed under KRS

353.300

to

353.380

shall be held, managed, invested or otherwise dealt with by such trustee under and pursuant to the direction of the court, as the rights and interests of the parties and the equities of the case may require, for the benefit of the persons entitled, or who may become entitled, thereto, according to their respective rights and interests.

History.

Enact. Acts 1944, ch. 76, § 9.